Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-904
Administrator, defined.

Administrator means the administrator or other chief administrative officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility or his or her designee.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1005;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 24;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 105.